Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.230

Streets over tidelands declared public highways.

All streets in any incorporated city in this state, extending from high tide into the navigable waters of the state, are hereby declared public highways.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.230. Prior: 1890 p 733 s 1; RRS s 9293.]

NOTES:

Public highways: Title 47 RCW.